Utah statutes.
17-33-4.5.   Council may refer an appeal to an administrative law judge for
a recommendation -- Council action on recommendation.
(1) (a)  A county legislative body may appoint one or more administrative law
judges to hear appeals referred by a career service council under this
section.
(b)  Each administrative law judge shall be trained and experienced in
personnel matters.
(2) (a)  If a career service council determines that it is in the county's
best interest, it may initially refer an appeal to an administrative law judge
who has been appointed under Subsection (1).
(b)  After holding a hearing, the administrative law judge shall make findings
of fact and a recommendation to the career service council.
(c)  After receiving the administrative law judge's recommendation, a career
service council may request the administrative law judge to hold a further
factual hearing before the career service council's decision.
(d)  A career service council may adopt or reject an administrative law
judge's recommendation, whether before or after a further hearing under
Subsection (2)(c).
